Massachusetts, session 194th, S1639.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 127 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
Section 172. No inmate or prisoner placed in the custody of a sheriff shall be transported
outside of the commonwealth for the purposes of labor or public or community service
programming unless there exists a bona fide public health or safety emergency. If such a bona
fide public health or safety emergency exists, the sheriff shall file a description of the purpose,
the proposed mode of transportation, the estimated duration of the time to be spent outside of the
commonwealth, the housing and security arrangements to be made during the proposed stay and
the estimated cost of the entire undertaking with the secretary of administration and finance, the
secretary of the executive office of public safety and security, the chairs of the joint committee
of 2

on public safety and homeland security and the chairs of the senate and house committees on
ways and means and shall obtain written approval from the secretary of administration and
finance and the secretary of the executive office of public safety and security prior to the
commencement of said transport.
of 2